Utah statutes.
32A-6-501.   Operational restrictions.
In addition to the restrictions, conditions, and requirements of Section
32A-6-105, each religious wine use permittee is subject to the following
operational restrictions:
(1)  A religious wine use permittee may purchase wine from state stores as the
department may designate at the department's cost plus freight charges.
(2)  A religious wine use permittee may not use wine purchased under the
permit for other than religious purposes.
